Iowa, session 2025-2026, SSB3051.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 5202XC (2) 91 sc/ns S.F. _____ Section 1. NEW SECTION . 97D.6 Revocation of rights to 1 pension. 2 1. As used in this section: 3 a. âBona fide retirementâ means the retirement of a vested 4 member of the system who is eligible to receive benefits under 5 the system. 6 b. âConvictionâ means a plea of guilty or no contest or a 7 verdict of guilty. 8 c. âPublic employeeâ means any individual who is employed by 9 a public employer and is entitled to a pension under chapter 10 97A, 97B, or 602. âPublic employeeâ includes a public official 11 as defined in section 68B.2. 12 d. âPublic employerâ means the state, its boards, 13 commissions, agencies, and departments, and its political 14 subdivisions including school districts and other special 15 purpose districts. 16 e. âSystemâ means the Iowa department of public safety peace 17 officersâ retirement, accident, and disability system under 18 chapter 97A; the Iowa public employeesâ retirement system under 19 chapter 97B; and the judicial retirement system under chapter 20 602. 21 2. In addition to any other penalties provided by law, upon 22 the conviction of a public employee for a felony, the public 23 employee shall lose all rights in and to the public employeeâs 24 pension under a system prior to a bona fide retirement and the 25 pension shall be revoked by the system. 26 3. If a public employee is convicted of a felony, the clerk 27 of the district court shall notify the applicable system that 28 a public employee has been so convicted. Any accumulated 29 contributions made by the public employee to the system that 30 have not already been returned to the public employee shall 31 be returned to the public employee. Any benefits received 32 by the public employee in excess of the public employeeâs 33 contributions shall be returned to the system. 34 4. The portion of the revoked pension that is not 35 -1- LSB 5202XC (2) 91 sc/ns 1/ 3 S.F. _____ attributable to contributions made to the system by the public 1 employee shall be considered property subject to forfeiture 2 under chapter 809A, and the public employee shall not be 3 entitled to such portion of the pension as a matter of law, and 4 the system shall proceed under the procedures of chapter 809A 5 to seize such portion of the pension. 6 5. This section shall not be construed in a manner that 7 impairs the rights of any individual under a marital property, 8 spousal support, or child support order. In addition, this 9 section shall not be construed to impair the statutory rights 10 of a governmental entity, including but not limited to the 11 right of a governmental entity to collect an amount from the 12 public employee for deposit in the victim compensation fund 13 established in chapter 915. 14 Sec. 2. Section 602.8102, Code 2026, is amended by adding 15 the following new subsection: 16 NEW SUBSECTION . 16. Notify the applicable system as defined 17 in section 97D.6 of a felony conviction by a public employee as 18 required in section 97D.6, subsection 3. 19 Sec. 3. Section 809A.4, Code 2026, is amended by adding the 20 following new subsection: 21 NEW SUBSECTION . 6A. The portion of a revoked pension not 22 attributable to the contributions of a public employee as 23 described in section 97D.6. 24 Sec. 4. Section 901.5, Code 2026, is amended by adding the 25 following new subsection: 26 NEW SUBSECTION . 15. If the defendant is a public employee 27 convicted of a felony as described in section 97D.6, the court 28 shall inform the defendant that portions of the pension of the 29 public employee are subject to revocation pursuant to section 30 97D.6 and forfeiture under chapter 809A. 31